Delaware, session 153, HB48.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 4183, Title 21 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 4183. Parking areas for vehicles being used by persons with disabilities. (a) For purposes of this section, the term âvehicle being used by a person with a disabilityâ means a vehicle: (1) That displays section: (1) âAccessible parking spaceâ means any parking space or parking zone designated by an owner or lessee of any public or private property for use by a vehicle being used by a person with a disability. (2) âVehicle being used by a person with a disabilityâ means a vehicle that meets both of the following criteria: a. Displays a valid special license plate issued pursuant to Â§â2134 of this title on the rear of the vehicle, or that displays a valid parking placard issued pursuant to Â§â2135 of this title on the front windshield rearview mirror of the vehicle or, if there is no mirror, on the dashboard, or that displays a valid plate, placard or other item issued under a similar statute in another state or country; and country. (2) In which the b. The person for whom the plate or placard is issued is either the operator or a passenger or, in the case of an organization, in which a person who is entitled to obtain a permanent or temporary placard is a passenger. (b) With the exception of a vehicle being used by a person with a disability, it is unlawful to park on public or private property any vehicle in any area under the control of the Department of Transportation or a local authority within its respective jurisdiction or under the control of an owner or lessee of private property that is designated as a parking space or zone for persons with disabilities which limit or impair the ability to walk and that is conspicuously marked as such. For purposes of this section, âconspicuously markedâ means that a vertical sign has been placed at an approximate height of at least 5 feet but no more than 7 feet when measured from the surface directly below the sign to the top of the sign for each parking space or zone. The sign must substantially follow federal specifications that identify a parking zone or space as one for persons with disabilities which limit or impair the ability to walk. A sign at least 12 inches wide by 18 inches tall that includes the internationally recognized wheelchair symbol of access substantially follows federal specifications. These requirements may not be construed to preclude additional markings, such as the international wheelchair symbol or a striped extension area painted on the space or zone, or a tow-away warning sign. that is designated as an accessible parking space. (c) Upon the discovery on private property of a vehicle, other than a vehicle being used by a person with a disability, in a designated an accessible parking space or zone for persons with disabilities, space, the owner or lessee of the private property may cause the illegally parked vehicle to be removed to a private storage area maintained for the safe storage of vehicles. Any costs of removal and storage must be borne by the owner or operator of the vehicle. Upon the discovery of a vehicle illegally parked in a designated an accessible parking space or zone for persons with disabilities that is under the control of the Department of Transportation or local authorities, the State Police, county police police, or municipal police having jurisdiction may cause the illegally parked vehicle to be removed to a private storage area maintained for the safe storage of vehicles. Any costs of removal and storage must be borne by the owner or operator of the vehicle. (d) In addition to unlawful parking on public or private property in a space or zone designated for a vehicle being used by a person with a disability, an accessible parking space, all of the following acts are prohibited on both public and private property and may be enforced pursuant to this section: (1) Creating or using a counterfeit license plate or parking placard, as described in Â§ 2134 or Â§ 2135 of this title; title. (2) Altering a license plate or parking placard issued pursuant to Â§ 2134 or Â§ 2135 of this title; title. (3) Parking on a striped area or access aisle within or adjacent to a space or zone designated for a vehicle being used by a person with a disability; an accessible parking space. (4) Being the person or organization to whom a license plate or parking placard has been issued pursuant to Â§ 2134 or Â§ 2135 of this title, allowing another to use the plate or placard; or placard. (5) Parking a vehicle with a license plate or placard issued pursuant to Â§ 2134 or Â§ 2135 of this title in a space or zone defined in subsection (b) of this section an accessible parking space, unless a person on whose behalf a special license plate or placard has been issued is being transported. (f) (1) A person or organization who violates this section must receive a mandatory fine of $200 $250 for a first offense, and for a subsequent like offense, a mandatory fine of $300 $500 or a term of imprisonment of not less than 10 nor more than 30 days, or both. community service. (2) In addition, a person or organization who holds a valid special license plate or parking placard issued under Â§ 2134 or Â§ 2135 of this title and who violates paragraph (d)(1), (2), or (4) of this section may receive an additional penalty of up to a 6-month suspension or the permanent revocation of the plate or placard. If a plate is suspended or revoked under this subsection, the person may apply for and be issued a regular license plate. (3) Minor variations of accessible parking space features, including the absence of a sign, are not a defense to prosecution under this section if the space is otherwise conspicuously marked. Â (4) Each accessible parking space sign that is required under Â§ 4183A of this Title 21 must display the current maximum fines established in subsection (f) of this section. Section 2. Amend Subchapter XI, Chapter 41, Title 21 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 4183A. Requirements for the design, construction, signage, and maintenance of accessible parking spaces. (a) For purposes of this section , â accessible parking spaceâ means as defined in Â§ 4183 of this title. (b) Where an accessible parking space is required under Titles II and III of the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA), 42 U.S.C. 12101 et seq., the accessible parking space must be designed and constructed in compliance with: 1) The 2010 ADA Standards for Accessible Design issued by the Department of Justice on September 15, 2010, and its accompanying guidance. 2) Any applicable county, municipal, or State building code or law. (c) No new accessible parking spaces may be installed, and no existing accessible parking spaces may be restriped, repainted, resurfaced or otherwise altered, until the county or municipal authority having jurisdiction over the construction or alteration of commercial buildings has issued a permit authorizing such action and confirming that any accessible parking spaces are in compliance with subsection (b) of this section. A county or municipal authority may allow subsequent restriping, repainting, or resurfacing of a lot that has been permitted in accordance with this section at least once without a permit where no change is made to the parking plan and the property remains compliant with the requirements of this section. (d) Upon completion of the work subject to permit, the public agency issuing the permit shall verify compliance by either conducting an on-site inspection or independently confirming compliance by use of documentation and photographic evidence submitted by the entity to whom the permit was issued, provided that the documentation and photographic evidence is sufficient to adequately assess such compliance. The enforcement agency may adopt a model form published by the State Council for Persons with Disabilities in consultation with the Architectural Accessibility Board to standardize submission of verifying documentation and photographic evidence. If the submitted documentation and photographic evidence is not sufficient to confirm compliance, an on-site inspection must be conducted. (e) All existing parking spaces that are not in compliance with subsection (b) of this section within 5 years after [the effective date of this Act] are in violation of this section. (f) In lieu of a permit under subsection (c) of this section, any facility covered under the Architectural Accessibility Act, Chapter 73 of Title 29, must receive a letter of approval from the Architectural Accessibility Board that confirms compliance with this section. (g) A county or municipal government may assess a civil penalty of up to $500 for a violation of this section. Before imposing a fine, the county or municipal government must allow 90 days for the responsible party to cure the violation. (h) Nothing in this section requires a county or municipality to conduct code inspections apart from its usual and customary practice for promoting building code compliance. Nothing in this section prohibits a county or municipality from charging fees associated with permits and compliance verification. (i) Nothing in this section prohibits any state, municipal, or local government or agency from adopting more stringent standards for accessible parking than those imposed by this section and applicable federal law, nor shall it prohibit any private or public entity from providing more accessible parking spaces than are required by this section or other applicable code or regulation. Section 3. Amend Â§ 110, Title 22 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 110. Parking spaces for use by persons with disabilities. (a) The county government of each of the 3 Delaware counties shall, on or before January 1, 2004, and the municipal government of each incorporated municipality within each county shall, on or before March 1, 2004, the State shall adopt regulations or ordinances regarding the duty of individuals and artificial entities to erect construct and maintain signage on parking spaces or zones for use by persons with disabilities. accessible parking spaces consistent with Â§ 4183A of Title 21. (b) The county government of each of the 3 Delaware counties and the municipal government of each incorporated municipality within the State shall adopt regulations or ordinances requiring that no new accessible parking space be constructed and no existing accessible parking space be installed, restriped, repainted, resurfaced, or otherwise altered until the county government or municipality issues a permit as required by Â§ 4183A of Title 21. Upon completion, the entity issuing the permit shall confirm compliance as set forth in Â§ 4183A(d) of Title 21. (b) (c) The signage regulations or ordinances adopted pursuant to subsection (a) subsections (a) and (b) of this section must include an enforcement provision, a penalty provision, and a provision which requires an enforcement officer to first issue a written warning to an individual or artificial entity who is required to erect and maintain signage, obtain a permit and to construct and maintain accessible parking spaces, but has failed to do so. so, consistent with the obligations of Â§4183A of Title 21. If, after 30 days from the date that a warning is issued, the individual or artificial entity has not erected and/or maintained the required signage, the enforcement officer may issue a summons or apply for a warrant in the name of the offending individual or artificial entity. (c) A (d) To comply with this section, a municipality may elect to adopt the signage regulations or ordinances of the county government of the county in which the municipality is located. A municipality which elects to do so may also adopt additional regulations or ordinances as required by its own particular conditions. Whether a municipality adopts its own signage regulations or ordinances, or adopts the regulations or ordinances of the county along with additional regulations or ordinances to meet particular conditions, the municipalityâs adopted regulations or ordinances may not be less restrictive than those of the county. Section 4. Amend Â§ 310, Title 9 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 310. Parking spaces for use by persons with disabilities. (a) The county government of each of the 3 Delaware counties shall, on or before January 1, 2004, and the municipal government of each incorporated municipality within each county shall, on or before March 1, 2004, the State shall adopt regulations or ordinances regarding the duty of individuals and artificial entities to erect construct and maintain signage on parking spaces or zones for use by persons with disabilities. accessible parking spaces consistent with Â§ 4183A of Title 21. (b) The county government of each of the 3 Delaware counties and the municipal government of each incorporated municipality within the State shall adopt regulations or ordinances requiring that no new accessible parking space be constructed and no existing accessible parking space be installed, restriped, repainted, resurfaced, or otherwise altered until the county government or municipality issues a permit as required by Â§ 4183A of Title 21. Upon completion, the entity issuing the permit shall confirm compliance as set forth in Â§ 4183A(d) of Title 21. (b) (c) The signage regulations or ordinances adopted pursuant to subsection (a) subsections (a) and (b) of this section must include an enforcement provision, a penalty provision, and a provision which requires an enforcement officer to first issue a written warning to an individual or artificial entity who is required to erect and maintain signage, obtain a permit and to construct and maintain accessible parking spaces, but has failed to do so. so, consistent with the obligations under Â§ 4183A of Title 21. If, after 30 days from the date that a warning is issued, the individual or artificial entity has not erected and/or maintained the required signage, the enforcement officer may issue a summons or apply for a warrant in the name of the offending individual or artificial entity. (c) A (d) To comply with this section, a municipality may elect to adopt the signage regulations or ordinances of the county government of the county in which the municipality is located. A municipality which elects to do so may also adopt additional regulations or ordinances as required by its own particular conditions. Whether a municipality adopts its own signage regulations or ordinances, or adopts the regulations or ordinances of the county along with additional regulations or ordinances to meet particular conditions, the municipalityâs adopted regulations or ordinances may not be less restrictive than those of the county. SYNOPSIS HS 2 to HB 48 seeks to streamline accessible parking laws and improve enforcement of accessible parking laws in Delaware. Although federal and state laws currently require specific design and construction requirements for accessible spaces, these laws are often ignored and rarely enforced. To that end, this Act requires that a permit be issued by the local county or municipal authority to ensure that accessible parking spaces are compliant with the design and construction requirements of the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) and any existing local laws. This Act permits a county or municipal government to assess a civil penalty of up to $500 on an individual or entity that does not construct and maintain ADA compliant parking spaces. This Act also increases the fine for unlawfully occupying an accessible parking space. Rather than imprisonment, the penalty for unlawfully occupying an accessible parking space may include community service. All accessible parking space signs must display the current maximum fine. HS 2 to HB 48 differs from HB 48 in that it does the following: (1) Requires state facilities to obtain approval through the Architectural Accessibility Board in lieu of a permit. (2) Removes state-specific accessible parking provisions of the bill and adopts the federal accessible parking provisions that are already in effect under the 2010 ADA Standards for Accessible Design issued by the Department of Justice on September 15, 2010, and its accompanying guidance. (3) If an existing accessible parking space is not ADA compliant within 5 years of the effective date of this Act, authorizes a civil penalty to be assessed against the individual or entity that is responsible for maintaining the accessible parking space. (4) Requires that all accessible parking space signs display the current maximum fine for unlawfully occupying an accessible parking space.